Utah statutes.
78B-18-108.   Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act.
This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001, et
seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15
U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices
described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).
